Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,125
Merger or consolidation with subsidiary.

(1) Unless the articles of organization or bylaws of the limited cooperative association or articles of organization or bylaws of the other organization otherwise provide, a limited cooperative association that owns at least ninety percent of each class of the voting power of a subsidiary organization may merge or consolidate the subsidiary into itself or into another subsidiary.

(2) The limited cooperative association owning at least ninety percent of the subsidiary organization before the merger or consolidation shall notify each other owner of the subsidiary, if any, of the merger within ten days after the effective date of the merger or consolidation.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 125;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 31.